North Dakota, session 69, SB2019.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from special funds and federal funds, to the
department of career and technical education for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the
department of career and technical education, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending
June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $5,118,145 $720,245 $5,838,390
New and vacant FTE pool 0 126,203 126,203
Operating expenses 3,046,350 1,699,261 4,745,611
Grants 11,507,349 2,500,000 14,007,349
Grants - secondary 41,537,780 10,500,000 52,037,780
Marketplace for kids 300,000 100,000 400,000
Science, technology, engineering, and 100,000 0 100,000
mathematics initiative
Adult farm management 1,706,138 (1,706,138) 0
Workforce training 2,500,000 750,000 3,250,000
Total all funds $65,815,762 $14,689,571 $80,505,333
Less other funds 14,500,485 3,927,524 18,428,009
Total general fund $51,315,277 $10,762,047 $62,077,324
Full-time equivalent positions 23.50 0.00 23.50
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative
assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One-Time Funding Description General Fund Other Funds Total
Virtual reality career exploration $0 $1,000,000 $1,000,000
Rent, moving, and office equipment 300,000 0 300,000
expenses
Total $300,000 $1,000,000 $1,300,000
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The
department of career and technical education may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant
FTE pool line item in section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to
transfer funds from the new and vacant FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages line item in
accordance with the guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved
by the sixty-ninth legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. OTHER FUNDS - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND. The
other funds line item in section 1 of this Act includes the sum of $1,000,000 from the strategic

S. B. NO. 2019 - PAGE 2
investment and improvements fund for the purpose of purchasing virtual reality career exploration
hardware and software.
SECTION 5. EXEMPTION - STATEWIDE AREA CAREER CENTER INITIATIVE GRANT
PROGRAM. The sum of $74,595,701 appropriated from the federal coronavirus capital projects fund for
the statewide area career center initiative grant program, of which $68,276,228 was appropriated in
section 1 of chapter 548 of the 2021 Special Session Session Laws and continued into the 2023-25
biennium in section 3 of chapter 27 of the 2023 Session Laws and $6,319,473 was transferred in
section 10 of chapter 21 of the 2023 Session Laws, is not subject to section 54-44.1-11 and any
unexpended funds from these appropriations may be continued into the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 6. EMERGENCY. The $300,000 appropriated from the general fund in the operating
expenses line item for rent, moving, and office equipment expenses in section 1 of this Act is declared
to be an emergency measure.

S. B. NO. 2019 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2019 and that two-thirds of the
members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of
said law.
Vote: Yeas 82 Nays 8 Absent 4
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State